DI-484
DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM

DI1B7-11

DTC B0106/54 Open in P Squib Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The P squib circuit consists of the airbag sensor assembly and front passenger airbag assembly.
It causes the SRS to deploy when the SRS deployment conditions are satisfied.

For details of the function of each component, see OPERATION on page RS-2.

DTC B0106/54 is recorded when an open is detected in the P squib circuit.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

¢ Open circuit in P+ wire harness or P- wire harness « Front passenger airbag assembly (P squib)
B0106/54 ¢ P squib malfunction « Airbag sensor assembly

« Airbag sensor assembly malfunction *Wire harness

WIRING DIAGRAM
See page DI-480.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Prepare for inspection. (See step 1 on page DI-549)

-

2 [ Check P squib circuit.

CHECK:
For the connector (on the front passenger airbag assembly
:l Airbag side) between the front passenger airbag assembly and the air-

CD % :l Sensor bag sensor assembly, measure the resistance between P+ and
Assembly P-

| oK:

Q] Resistance: Below 1 Q

tween front passenger airbag assembly and air-
bag sensor assembly.

R14286
Ho2142 Ho2251

@

LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM616E)

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector be-
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3 | Check airbag sensor assembly.

P Squib

/e

:l Airbag
Sensor

:l Assembly

H01023
H02144
AB0118 ABO0119
R13006 H01078

2

Check Connector

-—

DTC B0106/54

H02253

LAND CRUISER (W/G)

(RM616E)

PREPARATION:
(@ Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.
(b) Using a service wire, connect P+ and P- of the connector
(on the front passenger airbag assembly side) between
the front passenger airbag assembly and the airbag sen-
sor assembly.
Connect negative (-) terminal cable to the battery, and
wait at least for 2 seconds.
CHECK:
Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON and wait at least for 20
seconds.
Clear DTC stored in memory.
(See page DI-447)
Turn ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 20 se-
conds.
Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON, and wait at least for 20
seconds.
Check DTC.
(See page DI-447)
OK:

DTCBO 106/54 is notoutput.
HINT:
Codes other than code B0106/54 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

e )

(©)

Replace airbag sensor assembly.
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Check Connector

H01024
AB0118 AB0119
R13006 HO1078

DTC B0106/54

H01205

OK:

HINT:

4 [ Check P squib.
PREPARATION:
P Squib (@  Turn ignition switch to LOCK.
:l Airbag (b) Disconnect negative (-) terminal cable from the battery,
Cm:] Sensor and wait at least for 90 seconds.
gyl Assembly () Connect the front passenger airbag assembly connector.
:l (d) Connect negative (-) terminal cable to the battery, and
wait at least for 2 seconds.
ACC ON CHECK:

Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON, and wait at least for 20
seconds.

Clear DTC stored in memory.

(See page DI-447)

Turn ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 20 se-
conds.

Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON, and wait at least for 20
seconds.

Check DTC.

(See page DI-447)

DTCBO 106/54 is not output.

Codes other than code B0106/54 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG > Replace front passenger airbag assembly.

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check.
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